Alaska, session 34, HB304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 06 to read: 07 LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that the commissioner of 08 fish and game model the report required under AS 16.05.050(c), added by sec. 2 of this Act, 09 on the Department of Fish and Game's Professional Publication No. 08-01, titled "Economic 10 Impacts and Contributions of Sportfishing in Alaska, 2007." 11 * Sec. 2. AS 16.05.050 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 12 (c) Every four years, the commissioner shall produce and disseminate to the 13 public a report on the economic impacts of sport fishing in the state. 14 * Sec. 3. AS 16.05.130 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 01 (i) Money accruing to the state from the sport fishing angler access surcharge 02 imposed by AS 16.05.340(l) shall be deposited in a separate account known as the 03 sport fishing angler access account within the fish and game fund. The department 04 shall allocate money in the angler access account to production and dissemination of 05 the report on the economic impacts of sport fishing in the state required under 06 AS 16.05.050(c). The Department shall, after allocating funds for the production and 07 dissemination of the report under this subsection, allocate funds in the account to 08 programs intended to directly benefit license purchasers by developing, improving, 09 and maintaining access opportunities, facilities and other infrastructure, and services 10 for nonmotorized sport fishing. 11 * Sec. 4. AS 16.05.340(i) is amended to read: 12 (i) If the commissioner determines that residents of the state are entitled to 13 obtain licenses for sport fishing, including sport fishing for anadromous king salmon, 14 in Yukon, Canada, for the same fees that are charged to residents of Yukon for 15 comparable sport fishing licenses, the commissioner may adopt regulations 16 authorizing residents of Yukon to receive 17 (1) nonresident annual sport fishing licenses for the fees charged to 18 residents under (a) and (l) of this section for a resident sport fishing license; and 19 (2) nonresident anadromous king salmon annual tags for the fee 20 charged to residents under (a) of this section for a resident anadromous king salmon 21 tag. 22 * Sec. 5. AS 16.05.340 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 23 (l) In addition to the fees for a sport fishing license set out in (a) and 24 (d) of this section, each person who purchases a sport fishing license shall pay a sport 25 fishing angler access surcharge as set out in this subsection. A person who is eligible 26 for a $5 resident hunting, trapping, and sport fishing license under (a)(6) of this 27 section or a free license under AS 16.05.341 is exempt from payment of the surcharge 28 imposed under this subsection. The surcharge authorized by this subsection shall take 29 effect on the date established by regulation by the commissioner. The amount of the 30 surcharge must be clearly disclosed on each sport fishing license. The amount of the 31 sport fishing angler access surcharge to be paid under this subsection for each sport 01 fishing license is as follows: 02 (1) resident sport fishing license .........................................................$1 03 (2) resident hunting and sport fishing license .......................................1 04 (3) resident hunting, trapping, and sport fishing license .......................1 05 (4) nonresident 14-day sport fishing license .........................................3 06 (5) nonresident seven-day sport fishing license ....................................2 07 (6) nonresident three-day sport fishing license ......................................2 08 (7) nonresident one-day sport fishing license .......................................2 09 (8) nonresident annual sport fishing license .........................................5 10 (9) special nonresident military small game and sport fishing license ..1 11 (10) special nonresident military sport fishing license .........................1. 12 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 TRANSITION: REGULATIONS. The commissioner of fish and game may adopt 15 regulations necessary to implement the changes made by this Act. The regulations take effect 16 under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), but not before the effective date of the law 17 implemented by the regulation. 18 * Sec. 7. Section 6 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 19 * Sec. 8. Except as provided in sec. 7 of this Act, this Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.